Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,227
Entry upon property for purpose of inspection.

The State Fire Marshal, the state elevator inspector, and the deputy inspectors shall have the right and power to enter any public building or structure for the purpose of inspecting any conveyance subject to the Conveyance Safety Act or gathering information with reference thereto.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2518;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 63.
July 1, 2019